Hawaii statutes.
[§346-172] Rules for registration.
(a) The department shall adopt rules establishing minimum requirements to
ensure the health and safety of children provided care in a family child care
home. The rules may specify, but shall not be limited to, minimum requirements
concerning:

(1) The number of children which may be cared for at
one time and the ratio of adult to children;

(2) The health of the provider and children;

(3) Fire and sanitation standards;

(4) The supervision and allowable types of discipline
of children; and

(5) Protection of children who are provided care from
abuse.

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that
the:

(1) Minimum requirements established under this
section be less strict than the minimum standards established under section
346-162 for group child care homes and group child care centers;

(2) Minimum requirements be as simple and clear as
possible;

(3) Minimum requirements be germane to the provision
of care to children in a private home as opposed to a nonresidential facility
or institution, require as little recordkeeping by the provider as possible,
and require information and reports if deemed necessary, from the provider
which the department intends to scrutinize carefully and not cursorily; and

(4) Department establish minimum requirements, the
compliance with which can be assessed easily and objectively by officers and
employees of the department, providers, and parents and legal guardians of
children. [L 1985, c 208, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next